District of Columbia statutes.
48-1201

Possession or transfer of one ounce or less of marijuana.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other District law, the possession or transfer without remuneration of marijuana weighing one ounce or less shall constitute a civil violation.

(b)

A violation of subsection (a) of this section shall not constitute a criminal offense or a delinquent act as defined in § 16-2301(7).

(c)

The possession of paraphernalia associated with a violation of subsection (a) of this section shall not constitute a violation of § 48-1103.

July 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-126, § 101, 61 DCR 3482
This section is referenced in § 2-1515.05, § 2-1831.03, § 4-205.01, § 16-2327, § 23-1321, § 24-304, § 24-903, § 48-904.01, § 48-1103, § 48-1213, and § 50-1403.02.
Section 501 of D.C. Law 20-126 provided that the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.